Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,217
Judgment against state agency; liability of state.

If judgment for costs or damages are rendered against any such litigant and such litigant fails, refuses, or neglects to pay the judgment within three months after the date of entry of the judgment, then the State of Nebraska shall be liable for the payment of the judgment and shall pay the same.

Laws 1930, Spec. Sess., c. 8, § 2, p. 39;

C.S.1929, § 20-2232;

R.S.1943, § 24-335;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-335;

Laws 2000, LB 921, § 22.